Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.200

Supplier-required work.

(1) In the event a supplier requires the dealer to work on equipment to enhance the safe operation of the equipment, the supplier must reimburse the dealer for parts, labor, and transportation of equipment or personnel to perform the work on equipment covered by the requirements of the supplier.

(2) In the event a supplier requires the dealer to perform product improvement work on equipment, the supplier must reimburse the dealer for parts and labor.

(3) For purposes of this section, a supplier must compensate its dealers pursuant to the following schedule:

(a) The hourly labor rate for which the dealer is compensated may not be less than the rate charged by the dealer for like services provided; and

(b) Compensation for parts used in the performance of safety enhancements or product improvements as requested by the supplier may not be less than the amount paid by the dealer to obtain the parts, plus a reasonable allowance for shipping and handling.

(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, a dealer may accept the supplier's reimbursement terms and conditions in lieu of the terms and conditions set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

[ 2002 c 236 s 13.]